Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 289A.20, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Sales and use tax remittance; professional athletic events. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 289A.20, subdivision 4, paragraphs (a) to (c), for qualifying retailers, the taxes imposed under chapter 297A on the sale of the privilege of admission under section 297A.61, subdivision 3, paragraph (g), clause (1), to professional athletic events are due and payable to the commissioner on or before the 20th day of the month following the month in which the professional athletic event occurred. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "professional athletic event" means a sports game, match, activity, or series of games, matches, activities, or tournaments organized by a professional sports organization competing in Major League Baseball, Major League Soccer, the National Basketball Association, the Women's National Basketball Association, the National Football League, the National Hockey League, or the Professional Women's Hockey League; and new text end new text begin (2) "qualifying retailer" means a retailer that is a professional sports team that competes in Major League Baseball, Major League Soccer, the National Basketball Association, the Women's National Basketball Association, the National Football League, the National Hockey League, or the Professional Women's Hockey League. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2014. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin INTEREST AND PENALTIES.new text end new text begin Interest and penalties imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 289A, or any other provision of law, on sales and purchases covered by section 1 and remitted as provided in that section, and made after December 31, 2014, and before the day following final enactment of this act, are void. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end